District of Columbia statutes.
44-103.01

Authority to operate an assisted living residence in the District of Columbia.

It shall be unlawful to operate an assisted living residence in the District of Columbia without being licensed and in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 301, 47 DCR 2647